Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1933.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5555.1. Persons required to report suspected aggravated cruelty to animal.(a) Mandated reporters.--A person shall make a report of suspected aggravated cruelty against an animal if the person has reasonable cause to suspect that the animal is a victim of aggravated cruelty and the person is any of the following:(1) A licensed doctor of veterinary medicine.(2) A CERTIFIED VETERINARY TECHNICIAN.(2) (3) A veterinary assistant. <--<--1234567891011121314151617 (3) (4) An employee of a nonprofit society or association duly incorporated in accordance with 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 53 Subch. A (relating to incorporation generally) for the purpose of protecting animals or preventing animal cruelty.(b) Manner of reporting.--A report under subsection (a) shall be made to a law enforcement agency, either orally or in writing, and shall include, if known, the following information:(1) The species, name and description of the animal.( 2) The address and telephone number of the owner or other person responsible for the care of the animal.(3) A description of the nature and extent of the suspected aggravated cruelty, including the date and time that the suspected aggravated cruelty occurred or was discovered.(4) Any evidence of prior incidents of aggravated cruelty involving the animal.(5) Any explanation given for the suspected aggravated cruelty.(6) The name and contact information of the person making the report.(7) Any other information that the person making the report believes may be helpful in establishing the cause of the suspected aggravated cruelty or the identity of the person who caused the suspected aggravated cruelty.(c) Immunity.--A mandated reporter under subsection (a) acting in good faith shall have immunity from civil and criminal liability AND STATE LICENSING ACTION that might otherwise result from:(1) Making a report of suspected aggravated cruelty, regardless of whether the report is required to be made under 20250HB1933PN2521 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section.(2) Cooperating or consulting with an investigation under this subchapter.(3) Testifying in a proceeding arising out of an instance of suspected aggravated cruelty.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aggravated cruelty." A violation of 18 Pa.C.S. 5534 (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal)."CERTIFIED VETERINARY TECHNICIAN." AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF DECEMBER 27, 1974 (P.L.995, NO.326), KNOWN AS THE VETERINARY MEDICINE PRACTICE ACT."LICENSED DOCTOR OF VETERINARY MEDICINE." AS DEFINED IN THE VETERINARY MEDICINE PRACTICE ACT."VETERINARY ASSISTANT." AS DEFINED IN THE VETERINARY MEDICINE PRACTICE ACT.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1933PN2521 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718